Illinois, session 104th, HB2936.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 517-1.5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/17-1.5)7    Sec. 17-1.5. Limitation of administrative costs. 8    (a) It is the purpose of this Section to establish 9limitations on the growth of administrative expenditures in 10order to maximize the proportion of school district resources 11available for the instructional program, building maintenance, 12and safety services for the students of each district.13    (b) Definitions. For the purposes of this Section:14    "Administrative expenditures" mean the annual expenditures 15of school districts properly attributable to expenditure 16functions defined by the rules of the State Board of Education 17as: 2320 (Executive Administration Services); 2330 (Special 18Area Administration Services); 2490 (Other Support Services - 19School Administration); 2510 (Direction of Business Support 20Services); 2570 (Internal Services); and 2610 (Direction of 21Central Support Services); provided, however, that 22"administrative expenditures" shall not include early 23retirement or other pension system obligations required by   HB2936- 2 -LRB104 11939 LNS 22032 b1State law.2    "School district" means all school districts having a 3population of less than 500,000.4    (c) For the 1998-99 school year and each school year 5thereafter, each school district shall undertake budgetary and 6expenditure control actions so that the increase in 7administrative expenditures for that school year over the 8prior school year does not exceed 5%. School districts with 9administrative expenditures per pupil in the 25th percentile 10and below for all districts of the same type, as defined by the 11State Board of Education, may waive the limitation imposed 12under this Section for any year following a public hearing and 13with the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the 14members of the school board of the district. Any district 15waiving the limitation shall notify the State Board within 45 16days of such action.17    (c-5) A school district shall not enter into an agreement 18that rescinds an employment contract entered into with an 19administrative employee in exchange for a payment that exceeds 20an amount greater than 6 time the monthly salary of the 21employee, due to the unsatisfactory performance of the 22employee's duties.23    (d) School districts shall file with the State Board of 24Education by November 15, 1998 and by each November 15th 25thereafter a one-page report that lists (i) the actual 26administrative expenditures for the prior year from the   HB2936- 3 -LRB104 11939 LNS 22032 b1district's audited Annual Financial Report, and (ii) the 2projected administrative expenditures for the current year 3from the budget adopted by the school board pursuant to 4Section 17-1 of this Code.5    If a school district that is ineligible to waive the 6limitation imposed by subsection (c) of this Section by board 7action exceeds the limitation solely because of circumstances 8beyond the control of the district and the district has 9exhausted all available and reasonable remedies to comply with 10the limitation, the district may request a waiver pursuant to 11Section 2-3.25g. The waiver application shall specify the 12amount, nature, and reason for the relief requested, as well 13as all remedies the district has exhausted to comply with the 14limitation. Any emergency relief so requested shall apply only 15to the specific school year for which the request is made. The 16State Board of Education shall analyze all such waivers 17submitted and shall recommend that the General Assembly 18disapprove any such waiver requested that is not due solely to 19circumstances beyond the control of the district and for which 20the district has not exhausted all available and reasonable 21remedies to comply with the limitation. The State 22Superintendent shall have no authority to impose any sanctions 23pursuant to this Section for any expenditures for which a 24waiver has been requested until such waiver has been reviewed 25by the General Assembly.26    If the report and information required under this   HB2936- 4 -LRB104 11939 LNS 22032 b1subsection (d) are not provided by the school district in a 2timely manner, or are subsequently determined by the State 3Superintendent of Education to be incomplete or inaccurate, 4the State Superintendent shall notify the district in writing 5of reporting deficiencies. The school district shall, within 660 days of the notice, address the reporting deficiencies 7identified. 8    (e) If the State Superintendent determines that a school 9district has failed to comply with the administrative 10expenditure limitation imposed in subsection (c) of this 11Section, the State Superintendent shall notify the district of 12the violation and direct the district to undertake corrective 13action to bring the district's budget into compliance with the 14administrative expenditure limitation. The district shall, 15within 60 days of the notice, provide adequate assurance to 16the State Superintendent that appropriate corrective actions 17have been or will be taken. If the district fails to provide 18adequate assurance or fails to undertake the necessary 19corrective actions, the State Superintendent may impose 20progressive sanctions against the district that may culminate 21in withholding all subsequent payments of general State aid 22due the district under Section 18-8.05 of this Code or 23evidence-based funding due the district under Section 18-8.15 24of this Code until the assurance is provided or the corrective 25actions taken.26    (f) The State Superintendent shall publish a list each   HB2936- 5 -LRB104 11939 LNS 22032 b1year of the school districts that violate the limitation 2imposed by subsection (c) of this Section and a list of the 3districts that waive the limitation by board action as 4provided in subsection (c) of this Section. 5(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.)